Rhode Island statutes. Title 11 Criminal Offenses
Chapter 28 Malfeasance and Misfeasance in Office

11-28-1.
Failure to pay state funds into treasury.

Every officer or other person receiving or having in his or her hands money belonging to the state that should be paid into the state treasury, shall pay that money to the general treasurer within seven (7) business days after he or she shall receive it or at any other times that may be deemed necessary by the general treasurer. In the case of funds which have been received by the state court system, he or she shall pay at any other times that may be initially approved by the director of finance of the supreme court and then approved by the general treasurer or unless otherwise provided by law. Every person who shall, without just cause, neglect or refuse to pay over that money, shall be fined not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500) or be imprisoned not exceeding five (5) years.

History of Section.

P.L. 1896, ch. 29, § 20; G.L. 1909, ch. 39, § 20; G.L. 1923, ch. 37, § 16; G.L. 1938, ch. 605, § 26; G.L. 1956, §

11-28-1

; P.L. 1987, ch. 137, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 418, § 1.

11-28-2.
Failure of officer to pay over fines, forfeitures, or penalties.

Every officer who shall receive any fines, forfeitures, or penalties shall immediately pay them into the proper office where by law they ought to be paid. Every judicial, executive, or ministerial officer who shall refuse or neglect for three (3) months to pay over any fine, forfeiture, or penalty or any part of which that may have come to his or her hands to the proper officer to whom by law they should be paid or delivered, shall be fined three (3) times the value or amount of the fine, forfeiture, or penalty that was withheld or not paid over.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 276, § 22; G.L. 1909, ch. 342, § 22; G.L. 1923, ch. 394, § 22; G.L. 1938, ch. 605, § 22; G.L. 1956, §

11-28-2

.

11-28-3.
Failure of presiding officer or clerk of municipal governing body to perform duties.

The presiding officer of any city council or town council who shall refuse or neglect, when acting as the presiding officer, to put to a vote of the body over which he or she presides any appeal made by a member of the body from any ruling of the presiding officer, or who, when the appeal has been sustained, shall refuse or willfully neglect to put to the body the question which caused the appeal to be made, and any clerk or recording officer of any body who shall refuse or neglect to record in full the proceedings of any body of which he or she may be clerk as described in this section, shall be fined for each neglect or refusal not less than two hundred dollars ($200) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), and be disqualified for the term of five (5) years from holding the office of the presiding officer or the office by virtue of which he is the presiding officer.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 276, § 19; G.L. 1909, ch. 342, § 19; G.L. 1923, ch. 394, § 19; G.L. 1938, ch. 605, § 19; G.L. 1956, §

11-28-3

.

11-28-4.
Omission or delay of duty by sheriff, sergeant, or constable.

A deputy sheriff, town sergeant, city sergeant or constable, who shall receive from any defendant or any other person any money or other valuable thing as a consideration, reward, or inducement for omitting or delaying to perform any duty pertaining to his or her office, shall be imprisoned not exceeding six (6) months or be fined not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500).

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 276, § 21; G.L. 1909, ch. 342, § 21; G.L. 1923, ch. 394, § 21; G.L. 1938, ch. 605, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

11-28-4

; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 35.